test/src/morphology/V-kandoms_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - кандомс: # Verb 'to catch' - full paradigm
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: кандан
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: кандат
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: канды
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: канттама
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: канттада
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: кандыйхть

     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: кандонь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: кандоть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: кандсь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: кандоме
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: кандоде
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: кандсть
     
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1: кандолень
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2: кандолеть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3: кандоль
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1: кандолеме
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2: кандоледе
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3: кандольхть
     
     кандомс+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2: кундак
     кандомс+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2: кандода
     
     кандомс+V+TV+Opt+ScSg1: кандозан
     кандомс+V+TV+Opt+ScSg2: кандозат
     кандомс+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3: кандоза
     кандомс+V+TV+Opt+ScPl1: кандостама
     кандомс+V+TV+Opt+ScPl2: кандостада
     кандомс+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3: кандост

#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg1: кандсамак
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg1: кандсамань
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg1: кандсамасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg1: кандсамазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg2: канття
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg2: канттанза
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg2: канттядязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg2: канттядязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: кандса
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: кандсак
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: кандсы
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: кандсаськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: кандсасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: кандсазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl1: кандсамасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl1: кандсамазь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl1: кандсамасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl1: кандсамазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl2: канттядязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl2: канттядязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl2: канттядязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl2: канттядязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: кандсайне
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: кандсайть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: кандсыне
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: кандсаськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: кандсасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: кандсазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg1: кандомайть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg1: кандомань
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg1: кандомасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg1: кандомазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2: кандыхтень
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg2: кандонзе
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg2: кандодязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg2: кандодязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: кандыне
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: кандыть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: кандозе
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: кандоськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: кандость
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: кандозь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl1: кандомасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl1: кандомазь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl1: кандомасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl1: кандомазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl2: кандодязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl2: кандодязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl2: кандодязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl2: кандодязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: кандыне
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: кандыть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: кандозень
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: кандоськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: кандость
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: кандозь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: кандолемайть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: кандолемань
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: кандолемасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: кандолемазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: кандолийхтень
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: кандолензе
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: кандоледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: кандоледязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: кандолине
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: кандолить
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: кандолезе
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: кандолеськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: кандолесть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: кандолезь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: кандолемасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: кандолемазь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: кандолемасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: кандолемазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: кандоледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: кандоледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: кандоледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: кандоледязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: кандолине
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: кандолить
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: кандолезень
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: кандолеськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: кандолесть
     кандомс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: кандолезь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2: кантк
     кандомс+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2: кандода
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg1: кандомак
     кандомс+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg1: кандомасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: кантк
     кандомс+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: кандость
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg1: кандондярясамак
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg1: кандондярясамань
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg1: кандондярясамасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg1: кандондярясамазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg2: кандондярятя
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg2: кандондярятанза
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg2: кандондярятядязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg2: кандондярятядязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg3: кандондяряса
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg3: кандондярясак
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg3: кандондярясы
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg3: кандондярясаськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg3: кандондярясасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg3: кандондярясазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl1: кандондярясамасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl1: кандондярясамазь
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl1: кандондярясамасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl1: кандондярясамазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl2: кандондярятядязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl2: кандондярятядязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl2: кандондярятядязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl2: кандондярятядязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl3: кандондярясайне
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl3: кандондярясайть
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl3: кандондярясыне
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl3: кандондярясаськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl3: кандондярясасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl3: кандондярясазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1: кандолемайть
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1: кандолемань
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1: кандолемасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1: кандолемазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2: кандолийхтень
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2: кандолензе
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2: кандоледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2: кандоледязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3: кандолине
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3: кандолить
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3: кандолезе
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3: кандолеськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3: кандолесть
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3: кандолезь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1: кандолемасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1: кандолемазь
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1: кандолемасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1: кандолемазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2: кандоледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2: кандоледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2: кандоледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2: кандоледязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3: кандолине
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3: кандолить
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3: кандолезень
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3: кандолеськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3: кандолесть
     кандомс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3: кандолезь
#

     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1: кандондярялемайть
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1: кандондярялемань
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1: кандондярялемасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1: кандондярялемазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2: кандондярялийхтень
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2: кандондярялензе
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2: кандондяряледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2: кандондяряледязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3: кандондярялине
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3: кандондярялить
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3: кандондярялезе
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3: кандондярялеськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3: кандондярялесть
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3: кандондярялезь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1: кандондярялемасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1: кандондярялемазь
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1: кандондярялемасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1: кандондярялемазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2: кандондяряледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2: кандондяряледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2: кандондяряледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2: кандондяряледязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3: кандондярялине
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3: кандондярялить
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3: кандондярялезень
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3: кандондярялеськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3: кандондярялесть
     кандомс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3: кандондярялезь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: кандолексолемайть
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: кандолексолемань
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: кандолексолемасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: кандолексолемазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: кандолексолийхтень
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: кандолексолензе
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: кандолексоледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: кандолексоледязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: кандолексолине
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: кандолексолить
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: кандолексолезе
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: кандолексолеськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: кандолексолесть
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: кандолексолезь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: кандолексолемасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: кандолексолемазь
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: кандолексолемасть
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: кандолексолемазь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: кандолексоледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: кандолексоледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: кандолексоледязь
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: кандолексоледязь
#
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: кандолексолине
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: кандолексолить
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: кандолексолезень
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: кандолексолеськ
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: кандолексолесть
     кандомс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: кандолексолезь
#
